FST/hsi/morph_hsi_num.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    %+NUM
    %+MASC %+FEM
    %+SG %+PL

LEXICON Root
hoko numeral;  ! test only
barā numeral;
tereṛā numeral;
čāllā numeral;
panjerā numeral;

LEXICON numeral
%+NUM num_gender;

LEXICON num_gender
%+MASC num_number;
%+FEM num_number;

LEXICON num_number
%+SG #;
%+PL #;
